California, session 20252026, AB1551.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 71003 of the Food and Agricultural Code is amended to read:71003. The establishment of the commission is necessary for the efficient development and management of a national and international advertising and promotion program that will enhance the reputation of the California rice industry, create a more receptive environment for the industry and its products, and increase competitiveness of the California rice industry within the national and international marketplace. In addition, the commission is necessary to carry out the California rice industry’s commitment to responsible stewardship and increasingly efficient cultural practices. practices, and to maintain a sufficient footprint of annual rice acreage to support the wildlife habitat objectives of the state.